Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3455
Act, how construed.

The Legislature declares that the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act is necessary for the public convenience and welfare, is remedial in nature, and shall be construed liberally. Nothing in the act shall be construed to establish a statewide building code.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 55.